District of Columbia statutes.
18-708

Source and construction.

Sections 18-701 through 18-707 derive from Annex to Convention of October 26, 1973, Providing a Uniform Law on the Form of an International Will. In interpreting and applying this chapter, regard shall be had to its international origin and to the need for uniformity in its interpretation.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087